District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.25

Confidential disclosure of financial interest.

(a)

Any employee, other than a public official, who advises, makes decisions or participates substantially in areas of contracting, procurement, administration of grants or subsidies, developing policies, land use planning, inspecting, licensing, policy-making, regulating, or auditing, or acts in areas of responsibility that may create a conflict of interest or appearance of a conflict of interest, as determined by the appropriate agency head, shall file, before May 15th of each year, with that agency head a report containing a full and complete statement of the information required by § 1-1162.24. Members of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Board of Directors appointed pursuant to § 9-1107.01 shall file the report required by this section.

(b)

Upon review of the confidential report, any violation of the Code of Conduct found by the agency head shall be forwarded immediately to the Ethics Board for review.

(c)

On or before April 15th of each year, each agency head shall designate the persons in the agency required to submit a confidential report by name, position, and grade level, and shall supply this list to the Ethics Board and the D.C. Ethics Counselor on or before May 1st of each year.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 225, 59 DCR 1862
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1072(b), 59 DCR 8025
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-286, § 3(c), 60 DCR 2319
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1152(b), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 1-618.01.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “May 15th” for “October 2nd” in the first sentence of (a); and in (c), substituted “April 15th” for “September 1st” and “May 1st” for “September 15th.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-286 added “and members of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Board of Directors appointed pursuant to § 9-1107.01” in (a).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “members of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Board of Directors” for “Advisory Neighborhood Commissioners and members of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Board of Directors” in (a).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-57, December 13, 2013, 60 DCR 15168).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1072(b) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1074 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1072(b) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1074 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-364, June 23, 2014, 61 DCR 6765).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1152(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1152(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1152(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 1074 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 1072(a) and (b) of the act [which amended §§ 1-1162.24(c) and 1-1162.25] shall apply as of January 1, 2013.